Tennessee, session 114, SB1688.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 57-3-204(h)(3), is amended by
inserting the following new subdivision:
(F) May offer complimentary samples of the products it sells for tastings
pursuant to § 57-3-404(h)(2).
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1688
010621
- 1 -